Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 13.1, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 151, O.S.L. 2024 (21 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 13.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 13.1. Persons convicted of:
1. First degree murder as defined in Section 701.7 of this
title;
2. Second degree murder as defined by Section 701.8 of this
title;
3. Manslaughter in the first degree as defined by Section 711
of this title;
4. Poisoning with intent to kill as defined by Section 651 of
this title;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1591 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

5. Shooting with intent to kill, use of a vehicle to facilitate
use of a firearm, crossbow or other weapon, assault, battery, or
assault and battery with a deadly weapon or by other means likely to
produce death or great bodily harm, as provided for in Section 652
of this title;
6. Assault with intent to kill as provided for in Section 653
of this title;
7. Conjoint robbery as defined by Section 800 of this title;
8. Robbery with a dangerous weapon as defined in Section 801 of
this title;
9. First degree robbery as defined in Section 797 of this
title;
10. First degree rape as provided for in Section 1111, 1114 or
1115 of this title;
11. First degree arson as defined in Section 1401 of this
title;
12. First degree burglary as provided for in Section 1436 of
this title;
13. Bombing as defined in Section 1767.1 of this title;
14. Any crime against a child provided for in Section 843.5 of
this title;
15. Forcible sodomy as defined in Section 888 of this title;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1591 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

16. Child pornography or aggravated child pornography as
defined in Section 1021.2, 1021.3, 1024.1, 1024.2 or 1040.12a of
this title;
17. Child sex trafficking as defined in Section 1030 of this
title;
18. Lewd molestation of a child as defined in Section 1123 of
this title;
19. Abuse of a vulnerable adult as defined in Section 10-103 of
Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes;
20. Aggravated trafficking as provided for in subsection C of
Section 2-415 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
21. Aggravated assault and battery upon any person defending
another person from assault and battery; or
22. Human trafficking as provided for in Section 748 of this
title;
23. Domestic abuse by strangulation as provided for in Section
644 of this title;
24. Domestic assault and battery with a deadly weapon as
provided for in Section 644 of this title; and
25. Aggravated assault and battery upon a law officer as
provided for in Section 650 of this title,
shall be required to serve not less than eighty-five percent (85%)
of any sentence of imprisonment imposed by the judicial system prior
to becoming eligible for consideration for parole. Persons
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1591 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

conv icted of these offenses shall not be eligible for earned credits
or any other type of credits which have the effect of reducing the
length of the sentence to less than eighty-five percent (85%) of the
sentence imposed.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JUDICIARY
April 22, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED


















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1591 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)